Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.390

Mail theft—Possession of stolen mail—Commission of other crime.

Every person who, in the commission of mail theft or possession of stolen mail, shall commit any other crime, may be punished therefor as well as for the mail theft or possession of stolen mail, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

[ 2011 c 164 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 c 164: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.